North Carolina, session 2025, HB1176.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 85.
"North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission.
"§ 143-821. North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission created; membership.
(a) Commission Created. – The North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission is created.
The Commission is administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise
its powers independently of the Secretary of Commerce.
(b) Membership. – The Commission shall consist of the following seven members:
(1) Two members of the Senate, one from each party, to be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives, one from each party, to be
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) An individual who is active in Irish-American cultural and civic affairs, with
preference for an individual with a history of cooperation in the legislative
process, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(4) An individual active in public higher education who has an interest in North
Carolina-Ireland trade relations, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
(5) An individual recognized for the individual's achievements and experience in
international business, to be appointed by the Governor.
(c) Terms. – Members of the Commission shall serve terms of three years and are eligible
for reappointment.
(d) Vacancies. – Whenever a vacancy on the Commission exists, the appointing authority
shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy.
(e) Officers. – Members of the Commission may elect a chair and vice-chair of the
Commission.
(f) Quorum. – A majority of the Commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
*H1176-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Administrative Services. – The Department of Commerce shall provide
administrative services to the Commission.
(h) Meetings. – The Commission shall meet at least twice per year.
"§ 143-822. Duties of North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission.
The North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission has the following duties:
(1) Encourage bilateral trade between this State and Ireland.
(2) Encourage mutual investment in this State and Ireland, especially in
infrastructure and employment.
(3) Promote business, educational, and cultural exchanges between this State and
Ireland.
(4) Take joint action on policy issues of mutual agreement between this State and
Ireland.
(5) Submit an annual report to the General Assembly that includes the following:
a. The number of times the Commission met during the preceding year.
b. The minutes of the Commission's meetings.
c. Any recommendations or requests that may assist the Commission's
work.
(6) Address any other related issues, as determined necessary by the
Commission."
SECTION 2. By October 1, 2027, the North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission
shall submit its first annual report under G.S. 143-822(5), as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to provide administrative services to the North Carolina-Ireland Trade Commission.
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective October 1,
2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1176-First Edition